Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-534
Order, motion, or notice; service; delivery.

Whenever in any action or proceeding, any order, motion, notice, or other document, except a summons, is required by statute or rule of the Supreme Court to be served upon or given to any party, the service or delivery shall be made in accordance with the rules of pleading in civil actions promulgated by the Supreme Court pursuant to section 25-801.01.

Laws 1959, c. 100, § 1, p. 420;

Laws 1981, LB 42, § 15;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 8.

This section did not apply when the defendant in a paternity action did not appear in the action. State v. Buckhalter, 273 Neb. 443, 730 N.W.2d 340 (2007).

Service of agency's final decision was completed upon mailing pursuant to this section rather than upon receipt of decision by petitioner's attorney. Roubal v. State, 14 Neb. App. 554, 710 N.W.2d 359 (2006).

Notice was satisfied when address used was correct but included wrong office designation and no evidence showed notice was not received. City of Lincoln v. MJM, Inc., 9 Neb. App. 715, 618 N.W.2d 710 (2000).